Colorado, session 2026A, HB1121.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Congress enacted the "Clean Air Act" in 1963 when electronic
and digital business records were nonexistent;
(b) Colorado continues to suffer from high levels of air pollution
and, in the summer of 2024, exceeded the United States environmental
protection agency's ozone limits for 40 days;
(c) In May of 2023, the United States environmental protection
agency issued a limited disapproval of Colorado's state implementation
plan after finding that Colorado's practice of providing emissions records
to the state only on request did not sufficiently allow practical public
access to information necessary to determine compliance with the "Clean
Air Act";
(d) In July of 2023, Colorado's attorney general filed a petition
with the United States court of appeals for the tenth circuit for review of
the United States environmental protection agency's disapproval;
(e) The case settled, and the new presidential administration
rescinded the rule allowing Colorado to continue the current practice of
making air pollution records available to the state upon request, but not
making the records accessible to the public;
(f) Air pollution emissions travel from a polluter's private property
into the air of other private property owners and into public spaces;
-2- HB26-1121

(g) People have a right to know what pollutants and discharges are
emitted into the air they breathe and onto the property they own;
(h) Pollution records are now kept in easily accessible electronic
and digital formats that were unanticipated when congress enacted the
"Clean Air Act";
(i) The cost of electronic database storage for records is nominal,
ranging from one cent to 20 cents per gigabyte; and
(j) It is in the public interest and supports the health and welfare
of Colorado residents to require that pollution records be both available
to the state for inspection and accessible to the public.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25-7-109.7 as
follows:
25-7-109.7. Emissions records - public accessibility - civil
penalties - definition.
(1) Definition. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES, "CONFIDENTIAL BUSINESS INFORMATION" MEANS
INFORMATION THAT AN OWNER OR OPERATOR IS PERMITTED TO REDACT
UNDER APPLICABLE STATE OR FEDERAL LAW.
(2) Public accessibility of emissions records.
(a) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2028, AN OWNER OR OPERATOR SHALL
MAKE ALL EMISSIONS RECORDS THAT THE OWNER OR OPERATOR IS
REQUIRED BY STATE OR FEDERAL LAW TO MAINTAIN PUBLICLY AVAILABLE
AND ACCESSIBLE THROUGH A LINK ON THE OWNER OR OPERATOR'S PUBLIC
WEBSITE. THE OWNER OR OPERATOR SHALL MAINTAIN THE RECORDS IN A
DIGITAL FORMAT THAT IS DOWNLOADABLE.
(b) AN OWNER OR OPERATOR SHALL UPDATE THE RECORDS
MAINTAINED ON THE OWNER OR OPERATOR'S PUBLIC WEBSITE PURSUANT
-3- HB26-1121

TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION FOLLOWING THE SAME SCHEDULE
AS THE RECORDS ARE MADE AVAILABLE TO THE STATE OR THE UNITED
STATES; EXCEPT THAT ANY RECORDS PROVIDED TO THE STATE OR THE
UNITED STATES MORE OFTEN THAN MONTHLY MAY BE UPLOADED TO THE
OWNER OR OPERATOR'S PUBLIC WEBSITE ON A MONTHLY BASIS. FOR
RECORDS THAT ARE PROVIDED TO THE STATE OR THE UNITED STATES ON
A QUARTERLY BASIS OR LESS OFTEN, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR SHALL
UPDATE SUCH RECORDS ON THE OWNER OR OPERATOR'S PUBLIC WEBSITE
ON OR BEFORE THE FIRST DAY OF THE MONTH FOLLOWING WHEN THE
RECORDS ARE MADE AVAILABLE TO THE STATE OR THE UNITED STATES.
(c) THE RECORDS MAINTAINED ON THE OWNER OR OPERATOR'S
PUBLIC WEBSITE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION MAY
BE REDACTED TO PROTECT CONFIDENTIAL BUSINESS INFORMATION.
(d) (I) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO RECORDS THAT ARE GENERATED
ON OR AFTER DECEMBER 1, 2027.
(II) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION REQUIRES AN OWNER OR OPERATOR
TO INCLUDE RECORDS THAT WERE GENERATED BEFORE DECEMBER 1,
2027, ON THE OWNER OR OPERATOR'S PUBLIC WEBSITE.
(3) Civil penalties. CIVIL PENALTIES ASSESSED AND COLLECTED
FOR VIOLATIONS OF THIS SECTION PURSUANT TO SECTION 25-7-122 SHALL
BE CREDITED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 25-7-129 (2).
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-7-122, amend
(1)(b) introductory portion as follows:
25-7-122. Civil penalties - rules.
(1) Upon application of the division, the division may collect
penalties as determined under this article 7 by instituting an action in the
district court for the district in which the air pollution source affected is
-4- HB26-1121

located, in accordance with the following provisions:
(b) Any person who violates any requirement or prohibition of a
final order of the division or commission, an applicable emission control
regulation of the commission, the state implementation plan, a
construction permit, any provision for the prevention of significant
deterioration under part 2 of this article 7, any provision related to
attainment under part 3 of this article 7, or any provision of or
commission rule adopted pursuant to section 25-7-105, 25-7-106,
25-7-106.3, 25-7-108, 25-7-109, 25-7-109.5, 25-7-109.7, 25-7-111,
25-7-112, 25-7-113, 25-7-114.2, 25-7-114.5, 25-7-118, 25-7-141,
25-7-146, 25-7-206, 25-7-403, 25-7-404, 25-7-405, 25-7-407, 42-4-403,
42-4-404, 42-4-405, 42-4-406, 42-4-407, 42-4-409, 42-4-410, or
42-4-414 is subject to a civil penalty of not more than forty-seven
thousand three hundred fifty-seven dollars per day for each day of the
violation; except that:
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-7-129, amend
(2)(a) introductory portion, (2)(a)(IV), and (2)(a)(V) introductory portion;
and add (2)(a)(VI), (2)(a)(VII), (2)(a)(VIII), (2)(a)(IX), and (2)(c) as
follows:
25-7-129. Disposition of fines - community impact cash fund
- repeal.
(2) (a) The state treasurer shall credit the receipts from penalties
or fines collected under sections 25-7-109.7, 25-7-115, 25-7-122, and
25-7-123 in the following manner:
(IV) For state fiscal year 2024-25, eighty percent of the receipts
from penalties or fines collected during the fiscal year shall be credited
to the fund, and twenty percent to the general fund; and
-5- HB26-1121

(V) For state fiscal year 2025-26: and any state fiscal year
thereafter:
(VI) FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2026-27:
(A) THE FIRST FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS TO FUND THE
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT'S COSTS TO
IMPLEMENT SECTION 25-7-109.7;
(B) THE NEXT ONE MILLION DOLLARS TO THE MOTOR VEHICLE
EMISSIONS ASSISTANCE FUND ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 25-7-129.5; AND
(C) ONE HUNDRED PERCENT OF THE REMAINDER TO THE FUND;
(VII) FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2027-28:
(A) THE FIRST NINE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS TO FUND THE
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT'S COSTS TO
IMPLEMENT SECTION 25-7-109.7;
(B) THE NEXT ONE MILLION DOLLARS TO THE MOTOR VEHICLE
EMISSIONS ASSISTANCE FUND ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 25-7-129.5; AND
(C) ONE HUNDRED PERCENT OF THE REMAINDER TO THE FUND;
(VIII) FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2028-29:
(A) THE FIRST NINE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS TO FUND THE
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT'S COSTS TO
IMPLEMENT SECTION 25-7-109.7;
(B) THE NEXT ONE MILLION DOLLARS TO THE MOTOR VEHICLE
EMISSIONS ASSISTANCE FUND ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 25-7-129.5; AND
(C) ONE HUNDRED PERCENT OF THE REMAINDER TO THE FUND;
AND
(IX) FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2029-30 AND ANY STATE FISCAL
YEAR THEREAFTER:
(A) THE FIRST ONE MILLION DOLLARS TO THE MOTOR VEHICLE
-6- HB26-1121

EMISSIONS ASSISTANCE FUND ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 25-7-129.5; AND
(B) ONE HUNDRED PERCENT OF THE REMAINDER TO THE FUND.
(c) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(c) AND SUBSECTIONS (2)(a)(V),
(2)(a)(VI), (2)(a)(VII), AND (2)(a)(VIII) OF THIS SECTION ARE REPEALED,
EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1, 2030.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-7-129.5, amend
(2) as follows:
25-7-129.5. Motor vehicle emissions assistance fund - division
to provide grants - gifts, grants, or donations - definition.
(2) The motor vehicle emissions assistance fund is created in the
state treasury. The fund consists of money credited to the fund pursuant
to section 25-7-129 (2)(a)(V)(A) SECTION 25-7-129 (2)(a), any other
money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund,
and any gifts, grants, and donations received under subsection (5) of this
section.
SECTION 6. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-7- HB26-1121